Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 2. Birds
§ 23a.
Spring Snow Goose Conservation Order.

Authority

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081(a)
. In adopting this rule, the Fish and Wildlife Board is following the policy established by the General Assembly that the protection, propagation, control, management, and conservation of fish, wildlife and furbearing
animals in this State is in the interest of the public welfare and that the safeguarding of this valuable resource for the people of the State requires a constant and continual vigilance.

The Board’s authority to permit the taking of migratory game birds is found at

10 V.S.A. § 4082(b)
and at 50 CFR, Parts 20 and 21.

Purpose The purpose of this regulation is to establish a Spring Conservation Order for harvesting of snow and Ross’ geese. The United Fish and Wildlife Service has issued a Conservation Order with the intent to decrease the population of light geese
due to an overabundance of these species. Specifically, “[v]arious populations of light geese (greater and lesser snow geese and Ross’s geese) have undergone rapid growth during the past 30 years, and have become seriously injurious
to their habitat, habitat important to other migratory birds, and agricultural interests. The U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service believes that several of these populations have exceeded the long term carrying capacity of their breeding
and/or migration habitats and must be reduced.” The USFWS has set “forth regulations that authorize measures to increase harvest of certain populations of light geese.” This rule implements this directive.

Definitions

“Daily bag limit” means the maximum number of geese permitted to be taken by one person in any one day during the open season in any one specified geographic area for which a daily bag limit is prescribed.

“Possession limit” means the number of geese permitted to be possessed by any one person when lawfully taken in the State for which a possession limit is prescribed.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“Conservation order” means a special management action that is needed to control certain wildlife populations when traditional management programs are unsuccessful in preventing overabundance of the population.

“Department” means the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“Light goose” refers collectively to greater and lesser snow geese and Ross’s geese.

“Legal means” means the taking by the means described in Section 8.0 of this rule.

“Permit” means a document issued by the Department authorizing the taking of snow geese.

Species Subject to the Conservation Order Greater snow (Chen caerulescens atlantica), lesser snow ( C. c. caerulescens), and Ross’s (C. rossii ) geese that breed, migrate, and winter in North America.

Open Season

Season Dates: March 11 - Friday before Youth Turkey Hunting Weekend, annually.

Bag Limits and Possession Limits

Daily Bag Limit: 15 geese

Possession Limit: No limit

License and Stamp Requirements

Any person harvesting geese under this rule shall:

Possess and carry a valid Vermont State hunting license;

Possess and carry a valid Vermont Migratory Waterfowl Stamp;

Possess and carry a valid Federal Migratory Bird Hunting Stamp;

Possess and carry a valid Vermont Snow Goose Conservation Order Permit; and

Possess and carry proof of Harvest Information Program (HIP) Registration.

Hunting Methods

Light geese on which open seasons are prescribed in this section may be taken by any method except those prohibited in this section. No person shall take migratory game birds:

With a trap, snare, net, crossbow, rifle, pistol, swivel gun, shotgun larger than 10 gauge, punt gun, battery gun, machinegun, fish hook, poison, drug, explosive, or stupefying substance;

From or by means, aid, or use of a sinkbox or any other type of low floating device, having a depression affording the hunter a means of concealment beneath the surface of the water;

From or by means, aid, or use of any motor vehicle, motor-driven land conveyance, or aircraft of any kind, except that paraplegics and persons missing one or both legs may take from any stationary motor vehicle or stationary motor-driven land conveyance;

From or by means of any motorboat or other craft having a motor attached, or any sailboat, unless the motor has been completely shut off and/or the sails furled, and its progress therefrom has ceased: Provided, that a craft under power may be used to
retrieve dead or crippled birds; however, crippled birds may not be shot from such craft under power;

By the use or aid of live birds as decoys; although not limited to, it shall be a violation of this paragraph for any person to take migratory waterfowl on an area where tame or captive live ducks or geese are present unless such birds are and have been
for a period of 10 consecutive days prior to such taking, confined within an enclosure which substantially reduces the audibility of their calls and totally conceals such birds from the sight of wild migratory waterfowl;

By means or aid of any motor-driven land, water, or air conveyance, or any sailboat used for the purpose of or resulting in the concentrating, driving, rallying, or stirring up of any migratory bird; or

By the aid of baiting, or on or over any baited area. As used in this subsection, “baiting” shall mean the placing, exposing, depositing, distributing, or scattering of shelled, shucked, or unshucked corn, wheat or other grain, salt, or other feed so
as to constitute for such birds a lure, attraction or enticement to, on, or over any areas where hunters are attempting to take them; and “baited area” means any area where shelled, shucked, or unshucked corn, wheat or
other grain, salt or other feed whatsoever capable of luring, attracting, or enticing such birds is directly and indirectly placed, exposed, deposited, distributed, or scattered; and such area shall remain a baited area
for 10 days following complete removal of all such corn, wheat or other grain, salt, or other feed. However, nothing in this subsection shall prohibit:

(i)
The taking of all migratory game birds, including waterfowl, on or over standing crops, flooded standing crops (including aquatics), flooded harvested croplands, grain crops properly shocked on the field
where grown, or grains found scattered solely as the result of normal agricultural planting or harvesting; and

(ii)
The taking of all migratory game birds, except waterfowl, on or over any lands where shelled, shucked, or unshucked corn, wheat or other grain, salt, or other feed has been distributed or scattered as
the result of bona fide agricultural operations or procedures, or as a result of manipulation of a crop or other feed on the land where grown for wildlife management purposes: Provided, that manipulation for wildlife
management purposes does not include the distributing or scattering of grain or other feed once it has been removed from or stored on the field where grow

Nontoxic Shot

No person shall take light geese while possessing loose shot or shot shells loaded with shot other than nontoxic shot.

Approved nontoxic shots include: steel, bismuth/tin, tungsten/iron, tungsten/polymer, tungsten/matrix, tungsten/nickel/iron, tungsten/iron/nickel/tin, tungsten/bronze, tungsten/tin/bismuth, tungsten/iron/copper/nickel, tungsten/tin/iron, or other shot
approved by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.

Allowed Special Measures Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23 of this title, the following special measures may be used when harvesting light geese under this rule:

Unplugged shotguns (that can accommodate more than three shells);

Electronic calls.

Shooting Hours Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23 of this title, the legal shooting hours under this rule are: one-half hour before legal sunrise to one-half hour after legal sunset.

Wanton waste of migratory game birds No person shall kill or cripple any migratory game bird pursuant to this rule without making a reasonable effort to retrieve the bird, and retain it in his or her actual custody, at the place where taken or between
that place and either (1) his or her automobile or principal means of land transportation; or (2) his or her personal abode or temporary or transient place of lodging; or (3) a migratory bird preservation facility; or (4) a post
office; or (5) a common carrier facility.

Other Applicable Laws

All other federal and state laws and regulation relevant to the harvesting of light geese, including: importation, possession, custody, tagging, sale of parts and eggs apply unless otherwise stated herein.

No person shall at any time, by any means or in any manner, take, possess, transport, or export any migratory bird, or any part, nest, or egg of any such bird, in violation of any act of Congress or any regulation issued pursuant thereto.

No person shall at any time, by any means or in any manner, take, possess, transport, or export any migratory bird, or any part, nest, or egg of any such bird, in violation of any applicable law or regulation of any state.

Suspension If the Director of the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service suspends the Conservation Order, this Rule is automatically suspended.

HISTORY:
Added 2010, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. July 9, 2010.

§ 23b.
Waterfowl Boundary Rule.

Authority

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081
. In adopting this rule, the Fish and Wildlife Board is following the policy established by the General Assembly that the protection, propagation, control, management, and conservation of fish, wildlife and furbearing
animals in this State is in the interest of the public welfare and that the safeguarding of this valuable resource for the people of the State requires a constant and continual vigilance.

10 V.S.A. § 4082(a)
states: “The Board may adopt rules, under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, to be known as the ‘Vermont fish and wildlife regulations‘ for the regulation of fish and wild game and the taking thereof except as otherwise specifically
provided by law. The rules shall be designed to maintain the best health, population and utilization levels of the regulated species . . .”

The Board’s authority to permit the taking of migratory game birds is a found at

10 V.S.A. § 4082(b)
and at 50 CFR, Parts 20 and 21.

Purpose The purpose of this rule is to establish zones for the taking of waterfowl during the prescribed waterfowl season(s).

Zone Descriptions

Lake Champlain Zone: The U.S. portion of Lake Champlain and that area north and west of the line extending from the New York border along U.S. 4 to VT 22A at Fair Haven; VT 22A to U.S. 7 at Vergennes; U.S. 7 to VT 78 at Swanton; VT 78 to VT 36; VT 36
to Maquam Bay on Lake Champlain; along and around the shoreline of Maquam Bay and Hog Island to VT 78 at the West Swanton Bridge; VT 78 to VT 2 in Alburg; VT 2 to the Richelieu River in Alburg; along the east shore of the Richelieu
River to the Canadian border.

Interior Zone: That portion of Vermont east of the Lake Champlain Zone and west of a line extending from the Massachusetts border at Interstate 91; north along Interstate 91 to US 2; east along US 2 to VT 102; north along VT 102 to VT 253; north along
VT 253 to the Canadian border.

Connecticut River Zone: The remaining portion of Vermont east of the Interior Zone. The waterfowl season regulations for the Connecticut River Zone will be the same as the New Hampshire Inland Zone and will be set annually by the New Hampshire Fish
and Game Department.

Click to view

Click to view

Figure 1. Proposed change in Vermont Waterfowl Zone Boundary.
New boundary outlined in red

Display Image

IMAGE

HISTORY:
Added 2011, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. July 3, 2011.

§ 24.
Repealed.

§ 25.
Nongame wildlife species.

A plan for the management of nongame wildlife species in Vermont includes all members of the animal kingdom: mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, mollusks, crustaceans, insects, and other invertebrates; and is limited to native species not commonly
taken for sport or profit, nor classified as domesticated.

Projects determined in accordance with the plan will be coordinated by the Nongame and Natural Heritage Program and performed by program staff with assistance from other Fish and Wildlife Department staff and cooperating organizations and individuals.
Projects may also be performed on a contractual basis with qualified individuals and/or institutions.

The plan comprises four primary objectives: (1) inventories and status determination of species and natural communities, (2) species, habitat, and natural community management, (3) planning assistance and environmental review, and (4) outreach and education.
Determination of project priorities will include consideration of species status and degree of threat, population and habitat trends, level of knowledge, public interest and support, availability of funding, arenas underserved
by other institutions, and ability to make a difference.

Financial resources for project expenditures will be derived from donations to the Vermont Nongame Wildlife Fund, proceeds from sale of vehicle conservation license plates, federal funding sources, the business community, grants, and other sources authorized
by the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife.

Inventories and Status Determination of Species and Natural Communities: Inventories of Vermont’s wildlife and natural communities will be conducted to increase our understanding about Vermont’s wildlife, their rarity, threats to their continued survival,
and to help identify other conservation needs. Status will be determined for species and natural communities as practicable and the expertise of others will be solicited when needed.

Species, Habitat, and Natural Community Management: Monitoring and management of populations will proceed if needed based on status determination and level of knowledge. Measures to reduce threats or enhance numbers in populations experiencing decline
will be taken. In situations where a common species is negatively impacting other wildlife or humans, population control or management may be attempted. Species may be reintroduced when appropriate. Legal protection
of nongame species will be enforced by law enforcement personnel. Collection of nongame wildlife for scientific research, education purposes, or for the purpose of using them as the subjects of art or photography
shall be authorized by issuance of a Scientific Collection Permit. Other collections or take of nongame wildlife shall be authorized by Commissioner letter in addition to a valid Vermont Hunting License or Small
Game License. (2) (A) Species, Habitat, and Natural Community Management: Monitoring and management of populations will proceed if needed based on status determination and level of knowledge. Measures to reduce
threats or enhance numbers in populations experiencing decline will be taken. In situations where a common species is negatively impacting other wildlife or humans, population control or management may be attempted.
Species may be reintroduced when appropriate. Legal protection of nongame species will be enforced by law enforcement personnel. Collection of nongame wildlife for scientific research, education purposes, or for
the purpose of using them as the subjects of art or photography shall be authorized by issuance of a Scientific Collection Permit. Other collections or take of nongame wildlife shall be authorized by Commissioner
letter in addition to a valid Vermont Hunting License or Small Game License.

Land in state ownership will be managed using appropriate wildlife and natural community management techniques. Site-specific management on state lands and on other lands when landowner permission is granted may include placement of predator shields,
artificial nesting platforms, and informational signs; controlled burning; vegetation management; and water level stabilization. Wildlife and natural community management will be encouraged through publications
and other outreach efforts.

Planning Assistance and Environmental Review: Certain critical land and aquatic systems will be protected statewide. Protection will be afforded through Act 250 criteria and other legislation, land acquisition, purchase of development rights, conservation
agreements, and the assistance of interested landowners. Aquatic systems will be protected through current laws and legislation, and acquisition of riparian lands. Conservation and other planning will be assisted through
appropriate information sharing using the Biological Conservation Database (BCD). Caution shall be exercised so that revealing site-specific information does not result in threats to rare species and necessary habitat or
compromise landowner privacy interests.

Outreach and Education: To foster increased respect and appreciation of our natural heritage, education and outreach efforts will be directed toward achieving a better understanding of Vermont’s nongame wildlife, their habitats, and natural communities.
An Outreach and Education Specialist position will be integrated into the Nongame and Natural Heritage Program and help develop an education and outreach strategy. Activities to enhance nongame wildlife education will complement
other Department and Agency efforts, and those of other conservation education groups. Networking with other organizations and teachers will be emphasized in order to maximize information exchange. Products and activities
may include, but are not limited to, fact sheets, booklets, slide shows, videos, workshops, exhibits, and school programs. Opportunities for nongame wildlife education will be created when appropriate on public land. These
may include, but are not limited to observation areas and walking trails.

HISTORY:
Added 1997, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1020, eff. Aug. 1, 1997.